Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska50-446
Corporate farming and ranching court rulings; legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that the ruling of the United States District Court for the District of Nebraska in Jones v. Gale, 405 F. Supp. 2d 1066, D. Neb. 2005, and subsequent rulings on appeal affirming such ruling holding Article XII, section 8, of the Constitution of Nebraska to be invalid, enjoined, or limited in application has significant implications for the future structure, development, and progress of agricultural production in Nebraska.

Laws 2007, LB516, § 1.